Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Purposes and Rules of Construction.

Sec. 34.03.010.
Purpose and construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are to

simplify, clarify, modernize, and revise the law governing the rental of dwelling units and the rights and obligations of landlord and tenant;

encourage landlord and tenant to maintain and improve the quality of housing; and

make uniform the law among those states that enact it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)